Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-241.09
Bingo chairperson or alternate bingo chairperson; licensed gaming manager; presence during bingo occasion; when required.

(1) A bingo chairperson or another member of the licensed organization who has been designated as an alternate bingo chairperson shall be present during the duration of each bingo occasion conducted pursuant to a Class I license.

(2) A licensed gaming manager shall be present during the duration of each bingo occasion conducted pursuant to a Class II license, except that in the case of an emergency, the licensed organization's bingo chairperson or alternate bingo chairperson may substitute for the gaming manager.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 46;

Laws 1995, LB 344, § 6.